Hawaii statutes.
§11-341 Electioneering communications;
statement of information. (a) Each person who makes an expenditure for
electioneering communications in an aggregate amount of more than $2,000 during
any calendar year shall file with the commission a statement of information
within twenty-four hours of each disclosure date provided in this section.

(b) Each statement of information shall
contain the following:

(1) The name of the person making the expenditure,
name of any person or entity sharing or exercising discretion or control over
the person, and the custodian of the books and accounts of the person making
the expenditure;

(2) The names and titles of the executives or board
of directors who authorized the expenditure, if the expenditure was made by a
noncandidate committee, business entity, or an organization;

(3) The state of incorporation or formation and
principal address of the noncandidate committee, business entity, or
organization or for an individual, the name, address, occupation, and employer
of the individual making the expenditure;

(4) The amount of each expenditure during the period
covered by the statement and the identification of the person to whom the
expenditure was made;

(5) The elections to which the electioneering
communications pertain and the names of any clearly identifiable candidates and
whether those candidates are supported or opposed;

(6) If the expenditures were made by a candidate
committee or noncandidate committee, the names and addresses of all persons who
contributed to the candidate committee or noncandidate committee for the
purpose of publishing or broadcasting the electioneering communications;

(7) If the expenditures were made by an organization
other than a candidate committee or noncandidate committee, the names and
addresses of all persons who contributed to the organization for the purpose of
publishing or broadcasting the electioneering communications;

(8) Whether or not any electioneering communication
is made in coordination, cooperation, or concert with or at the request or
suggestion of any candidate, candidate committee, or noncandidate committee, or
agent of any candidate if any, and if so, the identification of the candidate,
candidate committee, or noncandidate committee, or agent involved; and

(9) The three top contributors as required under
section 11-393, if applicable.

(c) An electioneering communication statement
of information filed pursuant to this section shall be in addition to the
filing of any other report required under this part.

(d) For purposes of this section:

"Disclosure date" means, for every
calendar year, the first date by which a person has made expenditures during
that same year of more than $2,000 in the aggregate for electioneering
communications, and the date of any subsequent expenditures by that person for
electioneering communications.

"Electioneering communication" means
any advertisement that is broadcast from a cable, satellite, television, or
radio broadcast station; published in any periodical or newspaper or by electronic
means; or sent by mail at a bulk rate, and that:

(1) Refers to a clearly identifiable candidate;

(2) Is made, or scheduled to be made, either within
thirty days prior to a primary or initial special election or within sixty days
prior to a general or special election; and

(3) Is not susceptible to any reasonable
interpretation other than as an appeal to vote for or against a specific
candidate.

"Electioneering communication" shall
not include communications:

(1) In a news story or editorial disseminated by any
broadcast station or publisher of periodicals or newspapers, unless the
facilities are owned or controlled by a candidate, candidate committee, or
noncandidate committee;

(2) That constitute expenditures by the expending
organization;

(3) In house bulletins; or

(4) That constitute a candidate debate or forum, or
solely promote a debate or forum and are made by or on behalf of the person
sponsoring the debate or forum.

(e) For purposes of this section, a person
shall be treated as having made an expenditure if the person has executed a
contract to make the expenditure. [L 2010, c 211, pt of §2; am L 2013, c 112, §9]

Case Notes

Plaintiff noncandidate committee and government contractor's
as-applied challenge to the disclaimer requirement in §11-391(a)(2)(B) and the
corresponding definition of "advertisement" in §11-302, which
included the "electioneering communications" definitions in
subsection (c), rejected; the court concluded that the plaintiff's
advertisements fit within the regulatory "safe harbor"--they were an "advertisement"
that was an "electioneering communication" and was the functional
equivalent of express advocacy under subsection (c). 872 F. Supp. 2d 1023
(2012).

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next